Indiana, session 2026, HB1327.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-4-3-1.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. (a) This section applies only to an annexation
ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. This section does not apply to
an annexation under section 5.1 or 5.3 of this chapter.
(b) Not earlier than six (6) months before a municipality introduces
an annexation ordinance, the municipality shall conduct an outreach
program to inform citizens regarding the proposed annexation. For an
annexation under section 3 or 4 of this chapter, the outreach program
must conduct at least six (6) public information meetings regarding the
proposed annexation. For an annexation under section 5 or 5.2 of this
chapter, the outreach program must conduct at least three (3) public
information meetings regarding the proposed annexation. The public
information meetings must provide citizens with the following
information:
(1) Maps showing the proposed boundaries of the annexation
territory.
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


(2) Proposed plans for extension of capital and noncapital
services in the annexation territory, including proposed dates of
extension. In the case of an annexation under section 5.2 of this
chapter, a copy of the preliminary written fiscal plan.
(3) Expected fiscal impact on taxpayers in the annexation
territory, including any increase in taxes and fees.
(c) The municipality shall provide notice of the dates, times, and
locations of the outreach program meetings. The municipality shall
publish the notice of the meetings under IC 5-3-1, including the date,
time, and location of the meetings, except that notice must be published
not later than thirty (30) days before the date of each meeting. The
municipality shall also send notice to each owner of land within the
annexation territory not later than thirty (30) days before the date of the
first meeting of the outreach program. The notice to landowners shall
be sent by first class mail, certified mail with return receipt requested,
or any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt and must
include the following information:
(1) The notice must inform the landowner that the municipality is
proposing to annex territory that includes the landowner's
property.
(2) The municipality is conducting an outreach program for the
purpose of providing information to landowners and the public
regarding the proposed annexation.
(3) The date, time, and location of the meetings to be conducted
under the outreach program.
(d) The notice shall be sent to the address of the landowner as listed
on the tax duplicate. If the municipality provides evidence that the
notice was sent:
(1) by certified mail, with return receipt requested or any other
means of delivery that includes a return receipt; and
(2) in accordance with this section;
it is not necessary that the landowner accept receipt of the notice. If a
remonstrance is filed under section 11 of this chapter, the municipality
shall file with the court proof that notices were sent to landowners
under this section and proof of publication.
(e) The notice required under this section is in addition to any notice
required under sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 36-4-3-2.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under section 5.1, or 5.2, or 5.3 of this chapter.
(b) A municipality may adopt an ordinance under this chapter only
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


after the legislative body has held a public hearing concerning the
proposed annexation. The municipality shall hold the public hearing
not earlier than sixty (60) days after the date the ordinance is
introduced. All interested parties must have the opportunity to testify
as to the proposed annexation. Except as provided in subsection (d),
notice of the hearing shall be:
(1) published in accordance with IC 5-3-1 except that the notice
shall be published at least sixty (60) days before the hearing; and
(2) mailed as set forth in section 2.2 of this chapter, if section 2.2
of this chapter applies to the annexation.
(c) A municipality may adopt an ordinance under this chapter not
earlier than thirty (30) days or not later than sixty (60) days after the
legislative body has held the public hearing under subsection (b).
(d) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 3 or 4 of
this chapter in which all property owners within the area to be annexed
provide written consent to the annexation. Notice of the hearing shall
be:
(1) published one (1) time at least twenty (20) days before the
hearing in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(2) mailed as set forth in section 2.2 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 36-4-3-2.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter
or an annexation described in section 5.1 or 5.3 of this chapter.
(b) Before a municipality may annex territory, the municipality shall
provide written notice of the hearing required under section 2.1 of this
chapter. Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g), the notice must
be sent by:
(1) certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(2) any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt;
at least sixty (60) days before the date of the hearing to each owner of
real property, as shown on the county auditor's current tax list, whose
real property is located within the territory proposed to be annexed.
(c) For purposes of an annexation of territory described in section
2.5 of this chapter, if the hearing required under section 2.1 of this
chapter is conducted after June 30, 2010, the notice required by this
section must also be sent to each owner of real property, as shown on
the county auditor's current tax list, whose real property is adjacent to
contiguous areas of rights-of-way of the public highway that are only
included in the annexation of territory by operation of section 2.5 of
this chapter on the side of the public highway that is not part of the
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


annexed territory.
(d) The notice required by this section must include the following:
(1) A legal description of the real property proposed to be
annexed.
(2) The date, time, location, and subject of the hearing.
(3) A map showing the current municipal boundaries and the
proposed municipal boundaries.
(4) Current zoning classifications for the area proposed to be
annexed and any proposed zoning changes for the area proposed
to be annexed.
(5) A detailed summary of the fiscal plan, described in section 13
of this chapter, if applicable.
(6) The location where the public may inspect and copy the fiscal
plan, if applicable.
(7) A statement that the municipality will provide a copy of the
fiscal plan, if applicable, after the fiscal plan is adopted
immediately to any landowner in the annexed territory who
requests a copy.
(8) The name and telephone number of a representative of the
municipality who may be contacted for further information.
(e) If the municipality complies with this section, the notice is not
invalidated if the owner does not receive the notice.
(f) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 3 or 4 of
this chapter in which all property owners within the area to be annexed
provide written consent to the annexation. The written notice described
in this section must be sent by:
(1) certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(2) any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt;
not later than twenty (20) days before the date of the hearing to each
owner of real property, as shown on the county auditor's current tax list,
whose real property is located within the territory proposed to be
annexed.
(g) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 5.2 of
this chapter. The written notice described in this section must be sent
by:
(1) certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(2) any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt;
not later than thirty (30) days before the date of the hearing to each
owner of real property, as shown on the county auditor's current tax list,
whose real property is located within the territory proposed to be
annexed.
SECTION 4. IC 36-4-3-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), 4(h), or 4.1 of this
chapter.
(b) A municipality shall develop and adopt a written fiscal plan and
establish a definite policy by resolution of the legislative body that
meets the requirements set forth in section 13 of this chapter.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) and section 5.2 of this
chapter, the municipality shall establish and adopt the written fiscal
plan before mailing the notification to landowners in the territory
proposed to be annexed under section 2.2 of this chapter.
(d) In an annexation under section 5, or 5.1, or 5.3 of this chapter,
the municipality shall establish and adopt the written fiscal plan before
adopting the annexation ordinance.
SECTION 5. IC 36-4-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The legislative body of a municipality may,
by ordinance, annex any of the following:
(1) Territory that is contiguous to the municipality.
(2) Territory that is not contiguous to the municipality and is
occupied by a municipally owned or operated as either of the
following:
(A) An airport or landing field.
(B) A wastewater treatment facility or water treatment facility.
After a municipality annexes territory under this clause, the
municipality may annex additional territory to enlarge the
territory for the use of the wastewater treatment facility or
water treatment facility only if the county legislative body
approves that use of the additional territory by ordinance.
(3) Territory that is not contiguous to the municipality but is
found by the legislative body to be occupied by:
(A) a municipally owned or regulated sanitary landfill, golf
course, or hospital;
(B) a police station of the municipality; or
(C) a solar electric generating facility that is or will be
interconnected to an electric utility owned by the municipality.
However, if territory annexed under subdivision (2) or (3) ceases to be
used for the purpose for which the territory was annexed for at least
one (1) year, the territory reverts to the jurisdiction of the unit having
jurisdiction before the annexation if the unit that had jurisdiction over
the territory still exists. If the unit no longer exists, the territory reverts
to the jurisdiction of the unit that would currently have jurisdiction over
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


the territory if the annexation had not occurred. The clerk of the
municipality shall notify the offices required to receive notice of a
disannexation under section 19 of this chapter when the territory
reverts to the jurisdiction of the unit having jurisdiction before the
annexation. Territory that is annexed under subdivision (2) (including
territory that is enlarged under subdivision (2)(B) for the use of the
wastewater treatment facility or water treatment facility) or subdivision
(3) may not be considered a part of the municipality for purposes of
annexing additional territory.
(b) This subsection applies to the following:
(1) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
sixty-six thousand six hundred (66,600) and less than seventy
thousand (70,000).
(2) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
eighty-two thousand (82,000) and less than eighty-three thousand
(83,000).
(3) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
eighty thousand four hundred (80,400) and less than eighty-two
thousand (82,000).
(4) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
forty-six thousand (46,000) and less than forty-six thousand four
hundred (46,400).
(5) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
thirty-seven thousand (37,000) and less than thirty-seven
thousand nine hundred (37,900).
(6) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
thirty-six thousand five hundred (36,500) and less than thirty-six
thousand seven hundred (36,700).
(7) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
thirty-two thousand (32,000) and less than thirty-three thousand
(33,000).
(8) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
twenty-three thousand (23,000) and less than twenty-three
thousand three hundred seventy-five (23,375).
(9) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
two hundred thousand (200,000) and less than two hundred fifty
thousand (250,000).
(10) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) and less than three hundred
thousand (300,000).
(11) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
thirty thousand nine hundred (30,900) and less than thirty-two
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


thousand (32,000).
(12) A municipality in a county having a population of more than
eighty thousand (80,000) and less than eighty thousand four
hundred (80,400).
(13) A city having a population of more than five thousand one
hundred forty (5,140) and less than five thousand two hundred
(5,200).
Except as provided in subsection (c), the legislative body of a
municipality to which this subsection applies may, by ordinance, annex
territory that is not contiguous to the municipality, has its entire area
not more than two (2) miles from the municipality's boundary, is to be
used for an industrial park containing one (1) or more businesses, and
is either owned by the municipality or by a property owner who
consents to the annexation. However, if territory annexed under this
subsection is not used as an industrial park within five (5) years after
the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, or if the territory
ceases to be used as an industrial park for at least one (1) year, the
territory reverts to the jurisdiction of the unit having jurisdiction before
the annexation if the unit that had jurisdiction over the territory still
exists. If the unit no longer exists, the territory reverts to the
jurisdiction of the unit that would currently have jurisdiction over the
territory if the annexation had not occurred. The clerk of the
municipality shall notify the offices entitled to receive notice of a
disannexation under section 19 of this chapter when the territory
reverts to the jurisdiction of the unit having jurisdiction before the
annexation.
(c) A city in a county with a population of more than two hundred
fifty thousand (250,000) and less than three hundred thousand
(300,000) may not annex territory as prescribed in subsection (b) until
the territory is zoned by the county for industrial purposes.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, territory that is annexed under
subsection (b) or (h) is not considered a part of the municipality for the
purposes of:
(1) annexing additional territory:
(A) in a county that is not described by clause (B); or
(B) in a county having a population of more than two hundred
fifty thousand (250,000) and less than three hundred thousand
(300,000), unless the boundaries of the noncontiguous territory
become contiguous to the city, as allowed by Indiana law;
(2) expanding the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdictional
area; or
(3) changing an assigned service area under IC 8-1-2.3-6(1).
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


(e) As used in this section, "airport" and "landing field" have the
meanings prescribed by IC 8-22-1.
(f) As used in this section, "hospital" has the meaning prescribed by
IC 16-18-2-179(b).
(g) An ordinance adopted under this section must assign the
territory annexed by the ordinance to at least one (1) municipal
legislative body district.
(h) This subsection applies to a city having a population of more
than twenty-eight thousand (28,000) and less than twenty-nine
thousand (29,000). The city legislative body may, by ordinance, annex
territory that:
(1) is not contiguous to the city;
(2) has its entire area not more than eight (8) miles from the city's
boundary;
(3) does not extend more than:
(A) one and one-half (1 1/2) miles to the west;
(B) three-fourths (3/4) mile to the east;
(C) one-half (1/2) mile to the north; or
(D) one-half (1/2) mile to the south;
of an interchange of an interstate highway (as designated by the
federal highway authorities) and a state highway (as designated
by the state highway authorities); and
(4) is owned by the city or by a property owner that consents to
the annexation.
(i) This subsection applies to a city having a population of more
than thirty-four thousand (34,000) and less than thirty-four thousand
five hundred (34,500). The city legislative body may, by ordinance,
annex territory under section 5.1 of this chapter:
(1) that is not contiguous to the city;
(2) that is south of the southernmost boundary of the city;
(3) the entire area of which is not more than four (4) miles from
the city's boundary; and
(4) that does not extend more than one (1) mile to the east of a
state highway (as designated by the state highway authorities).
Territory annexed under this subsection is not considered a part of the
city for purposes of annexation of additional territory. A city may not
require connection to a sewer installed to provide service to territory
annexed under this subsection.
(j) A municipality may annex a residential development under
section 5.2 of this chapter that is not contiguous to the municipality. A
town may annex a residential development under section 5.3 of this
chapter that is not contiguous to the town.
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


SECTION 6. IC 36-4-3-5.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.3. (a) As used in this section, "residential
development" means a parcel of land that is subdivided or will be
subdivided into:
(1) lots, parcels, tracts, units, or interests that:
(A) include an existing Class 2 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-5); or
(B) are designated for the construction of a Class 2
structure;
each of which is encumbered by substantively identical
restrictive covenants concerning one (1) or more servient
estates located within the boundaries of the original undivided
parcel, or other governing document of record;
(2) lots, parcels, tracts, units, or interests that:
(A) include an existing Class 1 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-4); or
(B) are designated for the construction of a Class 1
structure; and
(3) a common area.
(b) In addition to annexing territory under section 3, 4, 5, or 5.1
of this chapter, a town may annex a residential development that
is not contiguous to the town, if all of the following are satisfied:
(1) At least fifty (50) proposed single family lots and sixty (60)
proposed multi-family lots will be within the residential
development.
(2) The nearest boundary of the residential development is at
least one and six-tenths (1.6) miles and not more than two and
six-tenths (2.6) miles outside the town's corporate boundaries.
(3) Upon construction, the residential development dwellings
will be connected to the:
(A) water service of the town; and
(B) sewer service of the town or a regional sewer district
established under IC 13-26.
(4) The residential development includes a commercial area
containing or proposed to contain buildings intended to be
used and operated for commercial purposes.
(5) The residential development that connects the residential
development to the corporate limits of the town is adjacent to
the public highway right-of-way which is part of the state
highway system (as defined in IC 8-23-1-40).
(6) The annexation territory includes only the public highway
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


right-of-way and the residential development.
(7) The aggregate external boundary of the annexation
territory that coincides with the boundary of the municipality
is greater than zero (0).
(c) The owner of the property that is the site of the residential
development may file a petition with the legislative body of the
town requesting the town to annex all of the property that
comprises the residential development site. The annexation may
proceed only if the town adopts a resolution approving the
initiation of the annexation process not more than sixty (60) days
after the petition is filed. If the town does not adopt a resolution
within the sixty (60) day period, the petition is void.
(d) If the town legislative body adopts a resolution approving
initiation of the annexation, the town shall prepare a written
preliminary fiscal plan that must be made available to the public
by posting the fiscal plan and any revisions to the fiscal plan on the
town's website. Before adopting the annexation ordinance, the
town legislative body shall adopt a written fiscal plan by resolution
that incorporates any revisions made to the preliminary fiscal plan.
(e) The town shall hold a public hearing not earlier than thirty
(30) days after the date the annexation ordinance is introduced. All
interested parties must have the opportunity to testify as to the
proposed annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be published in
accordance with IC 5-3-1 except that the notice shall be published
at least thirty (30) days before the hearing. The town may adopt an
ordinance not earlier than thirty (30) days or not later than sixty
(60) days after the town legislative body has held the public hearing
under this subsection.
(f) Territory annexed under this section may not be considered
a part of the town for purposes of annexing additional territory
under section 3 or 4 of this chapter. However, territory annexed
under this chapter shall be considered a part of the town for
purposes of annexing additional territory under section 5 or 5.1 of
this chapter.
(g) For purposes of an annexation under this section:
(1) section 1.5 of this chapter does not apply; and
(2) the landowner of the public highway right-of-way that is
part of the state highway system (as defined in IC 8-23-1-40)
is considered to be the state of Indiana.
(h) An annexation ordinance adopted under this section takes
effect not less than thirty (30) days after the adoption of the
ordinance and upon the filing and recording of the ordinance
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


under section 22 of this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 36-4-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 235, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) After an ordinance is adopted
under section 3, 4, 5, 5.1, or 5.2, or 5.3 of this chapter, it must be
published in the manner prescribed by IC 5-3-1. Except as provided in
subsection (b), (c), or (e), in the absence of remonstrance and appeal
under section 11 or 15.5 of this chapter, the ordinance takes effect at
least ninety (90) days after its publication and upon the filing required
by section 22(a) of this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of this section, territory that has been:
(1) added to an existing fire protection district under
IC 36-8-11-11; or
(2) approved by ordinance of the county legislative body to be
added to an existing fire protection district under IC 36-8-11-11,
notwithstanding that the territory's addition to the fire protection
district has not yet taken effect;
shall be considered a part of the fire protection district as of the date
that the fire protection district was originally established.
(c) This subsection applies only to a fire protection district
established after July 1, 1987. This subsection does not apply to an
annexation under subsection (f). Whenever a municipality annexes
territory, all or part of which lies within a fire protection district (IC
36-8-11), the annexation ordinance (in the absence of remonstrance
and appeal under section 11 or 15.5 of this chapter) takes effect the
second January 1 that follows the date the ordinance is adopted and
upon the filing required by section 22(a) of this chapter. The
municipality shall:
(1) provide fire protection to that territory beginning the date the
ordinance is effective; and
(2) send written notice to the fire protection district of the date the
municipality will begin to provide fire protection to the annexed
territory within ten (10) days of the date the ordinance is adopted.
(d) This subsection applies only to a fire protection district
established after July 1, 1987. This subsection does not apply to an
annexation under subsection (f). If the fire protection district from
which a municipality annexes territory is indebted or has outstanding
unpaid bonds or other obligations at the time the annexation is
effective, the municipality is liable for and shall pay that indebtedness
in the same ratio as the assessed valuation of the property in the
annexed territory (that is part of the fire protection district) bears to the
assessed valuation of all property in the fire protection district, as
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


shown by the most recent assessment for taxation before the
annexation, unless the assessed property within the municipality is
already liable for the indebtedness. The annexing municipality shall
pay its indebtedness under this section to the board of fire trustees. If
the indebtedness consists of outstanding unpaid bonds or notes of the
fire protection district, the payments to the board of fire trustees shall
be made as the principal or interest on the bonds or notes becomes due.
(e) This subsection applies to an annexation initiated by property
owners under section 5.1 of this chapter in which all property owners
within the area to be annexed petition the municipality to be annexed.
Subject to subsection (c), and in the absence of an appeal under section
15.5 of this chapter, an annexation ordinance takes effect at least thirty
(30) days after its publication and upon the filing required by section
22(a) of this chapter.
(f) Whenever a municipality annexes territory that lies within a fire
protection district that has a total net assessed value (as determined by
the county auditor) of more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000)
on the date the annexation ordinance is adopted:
(1) the annexed area shall remain a part of the fire protection
district after the annexation takes effect; and
(2) the fire protection district shall continue to provide fire
protection services to the annexed area.
The municipality shall not tax the annexed territory for fire protection
services. The annexing municipality shall establish a special fire fund
for all fire protection services that are provided by the municipality
within the area of the municipality that is not within the fire protection
district, and which shall not be assessed to the annexed special taxing
district. The annexed territory that lies within the fire protection district
shall continue to be part of the fire protection district special taxing
district.
(g) This subsection applies to an annexation initiated by a
property owner under section 5.3 of this chapter. Subject to
subsection (c), an annexation ordinance takes effect at least thirty
(30) days after the ordinance's publication and upon the filing
required by section 22(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 36-4-3-7.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 236, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.2. (a) This section applies to an
annexation that satisfies all of the following:
(1) The annexation ordinance is adopted after December 31,
2020.
(2) The annexation is initiated by property owners under section
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


5.1 of this chapter in which all property owners within the
annexation territory petition the municipality to be annexed.
(3) All or part of the annexation territory is within a fire
protection district that was established after July 1, 1987.
(4) At least a majority of the members of the board of trustees of
the fire protection district adopt a resolution consenting to the
annexation.
(5) The portion of the annexation territory located within the fire
protection district constitutes less than three percent (3%) of the
total net assessed value (as determined by the county auditor) of
the fire protection district on the date the annexation ordinance is
adopted.
(b) Section 7(b) and 7(d) of this chapter apply to an annexation
under this section.
(c) Section 7(a), 7(c), 7(e), and 7(f), and 7(g) of this chapter do not
apply to an annexation under this section.
(d) After an annexation ordinance is adopted, the ordinance must be
published in the manner prescribed by IC 5-3-1. In the absence of an
appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, the annexation ordinance
takes effect at least thirty (30) days after its publication and upon the
filing required by section 22(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 36-4-3-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply
to an ordinance adopted under section 5, or 5.1, or 5.3 of this chapter.
(b) An ordinance adopted under section 3 or 4 of this chapter must
include terms and conditions fairly calculated to make the annexation
equitable to the property owners and residents of the municipality and
the annexed territory. The terms and conditions may include:
(1) postponing the effective date of the annexation for not more
than three (3) years; and
(2) establishing equitable provisions for the future management
and improvement of the annexed territory and for the rendering of
needed services.
(c) This subsection applies to territory sought to be annexed that
meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The resident population density of the territory is at least three
(3) persons per acre.
(2) The territory is subdivided or is parceled through separate
ownerships into lots or parcels such that at least sixty percent
(60%) of the total number of lots and parcels are not more than
one (1) acre.
This subsection does not apply to an ordinance annexing territory
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


described in section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter. The
ordinance must include terms and conditions impounding in a special
fund all of the municipal property taxes imposed on the annexed
territory after the annexation takes effect that are not used to meet the
basic services described in section 13(d)(4) and 13(d)(5) of this chapter
for a period of at least three (3) years. The impounded property taxes
must be used to provide additional services that were not specified in
the plan of annexation. The impounded property taxes in the fund shall
be expended as set forth in this section, not later than five (5) years
after the annexation becomes effective.
SECTION 10. IC 36-4-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.243-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A town must obtain the consent of both the
metropolitan development commission and the legislative body of a
county having a consolidated city before annexing territory within the
county where a consolidated city is located.
(b) A town may not annex within an area that extends one (1) mile
outside the corporate boundaries of a second or third class city. A town
may annex within the area that extends:
(1) more than one (1) mile; and
(2) not more than three (3) miles;
outside the corporate boundaries of a second or third class city, if the
annexation by the town does not include territory that extends more
than one (1) mile outside the corporate boundaries of the town.
(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to:
(1) a town that proposes to annex territory located in a different
county than the city; or
(2) an annexation by a town that is:
(A) an annexation under section 5, or 5.1, or 5.3 of this
chapter; or
(B) consented to by at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the
owners of land in the territory the town proposes to annex.
(d) In determining the total number of landowners of the annexed
territory and whether signers of a consent under subsection (c)(2)(B)
are landowners, the names appearing on the tax duplicate for that
territory constitute prima facie evidence of ownership. Only one (1)
person having an interest in each single property, as evidenced by the
tax duplicate, is considered a landowner for purposes of this section.
(e) Each municipality that is known as an included town under
IC 36-3-1-7 is also considered a town for purposes of this section.
SECTION 11. IC 36-4-3-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2016,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) This subsection applies only to an
annexation for which an annexation ordinance was adopted before July
1, 2015. Except as provided in section 5.1(i) of this chapter and
subsections (e) and (f), whenever territory is annexed by a municipality
under this chapter, the annexation may be appealed by filing with the
circuit or superior court of a county in which the annexed territory is
located a written remonstrance signed by:
(1) at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the owners of land in the
annexed territory; or
(2) the owners of more than seventy-five percent (75%) in
assessed valuation of the land in the annexed territory.
The remonstrance must be filed within ninety (90) days after the
publication of the annexation ordinance under section 7 of this chapter,
must be accompanied by a copy of that ordinance, and must state the
reason why the annexation should not take place.
(b) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted before July 1, 2015. On receipt of
the remonstrance, the court shall determine whether the remonstrance
has the necessary signatures. In determining the total number of
landowners of the annexed territory and whether signers of the
remonstrance are landowners, the names appearing on the tax duplicate
for that territory constitute prima facie evidence of ownership. Only
one (1) person having an interest in each single property, as evidenced
by the tax duplicate, is considered a landowner for purposes of this
section.
(c) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted before July 1, 2015. If the court
determines that the remonstrance is sufficient, the court shall fix a time,
within sixty (60) days after the court's determination, for a hearing on
the remonstrance. Notice of the proceedings, in the form of a summons,
shall be served on the annexing municipality. The municipality is the
defendant in the cause and shall appear and answer.
(d) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted after June 30, 2015. If the
requirements of section 11.3(c) or (after December 31, 2016) section
11.4 of this chapter are met, the annexation may be appealed by filing
with the circuit or superior court of a county in which the annexed
territory is located:
(1) the signed remonstrances filed with the county auditor;
(2) the county auditor's certification under section 11.2(i) of this
chapter;
(3) the annexation ordinance; and
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87


(4) a statement of the reason why the annexation should not take
place.
The remonstrance must be filed with the court not later than fifteen
(15) business days after the date the county auditor files the certificate
with the legislative body under section 11.2(i) of this chapter. After a
remonstrance petition is filed with the court, any person who signed a
remonstrance may file with the court a verified, written revocation of
the person's opposition to the annexation.
(e) If an annexation is initiated by property owners under section 5.1
or 5.3 of this chapter and all property owners within the area to be
annexed petition the municipality to be annexed, a remonstrance to the
annexation may not be filed under this section.
(f) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted before July 1, 2015. This subsection
applies if:
(1) the territory to be annexed consists of not more than one
hundred (100) parcels; and
(2) eighty percent (80%) of the boundary of the territory proposed
to be annexed is contiguous to the municipality.
An annexation may be appealed by filing with the circuit or superior
court of a county in which the annexed territory is located a written
remonstrance signed by at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the
owners of land in the annexed territory as determined under subsection
(b).
2026 IN 1327—LS 7080/DI 87